Utah statutes.
61-2-11.   Grounds for disciplinary action.
The following acts are unlawful for a person required to be licensed under
this chapter:
(1)  making a substantial misrepresentation;
(2)  making a false promise of a character likely to influence, persuade, or
induce;
(3)  pursuing a continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation, or of
making false promises through agents, sales agents, advertising, or otherwise;
(4)  acting for more than one party in a transaction without the informed
consent of all parties;
(5) (a)  acting as an associate broker or sales agent while not licensed with
a licensed principal broker;
(b)  representing or attempting to represent a broker other than the principal
broker with whom the person is affiliated; or
(c)  representing as sales agent or having a contractual relationship similar
to that of sales agent with other than a licensed principal broker;
(6) (a)  failing, within a reasonable time, to account for or to remit monies
coming into the person's possession that belong to others;
(b)  commingling the monies described in Subsection (6)(a) with the person's
own monies; or
(c)  diverting the monies described in Subsection (6)(a) from the purpose for
which they were received;
(7)  paying or offering to pay valuable consideration, as defined by the
commission, to a person not licensed under this chapter, except that valuable
consideration may be shared:
(a)  with a licensed principal broker of another jurisdiction; or
(b)  as provided under:
(i)  Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act;
(ii)  Title 16, Chapter 11, Professional Corporation Act; or
(iii)  Title 48, Chapter 2c, Utah Revised Limited Liability Company Act;
(8)  being unworthy or incompetent to act as a principal broker, associate
broker, or sales agent in such manner as to safeguard the interests of the
public;
(9)  failing to voluntarily furnish a copy of a document to all parties
executing the document;
(10)  failing to keep and make available for inspection by the division a
record of each transaction, including:
(a)  the names of buyers and sellers or lessees and lessors;
(b)  the identification of the property;
(c)  the sale or rental price;
(d)  monies received in trust;
(e)  agreements or instructions from buyers and sellers or lessees and
lessors; and
(f)  any other information required by rule;
(11)  failing to disclose, in writing, in the purchase, sale, or rental of
property, whether the purchase, sale, or rental is made for that person or for
an undisclosed principal;
(12)  regardless of whether the crime is related to real estate, being
convicted of a criminal offense involving moral turpitude within five years of
the most recent application, including:
(a)  a conviction based upon a plea of nolo contendere; or
(b)  a plea held in abeyance to a criminal offense involving moral turpitude;
(13)  advertising the availability of real estate or the services of a
licensee in a false, misleading, or deceptive manner;
(14)  in the case of a principal broker or a licensee who is a branch manager,
failing to exercise reasonable supervision over the activities of the
principal broker's or branch manager's licensee or unlicensed staff;
(15)  violating or disregarding:
(a)  this chapter;
(b)  an order of the commission; or
(c)  the rules adopted by the commission and the division;
(16)  breaching a fiduciary duty owed by a licensee to the licensee's
principal in a real estate transaction;
(17)  any other conduct which constitutes dishonest dealing;
(18)  unprofessional conduct as defined by statute or rule;
(19)  on the basis of misconduct in a professional capacity that relates to
character, honesty, integrity, or truthfulness, having one of the following
suspended, revoked, surrendered, or cancelled:
(a)  a real estate license issued by another jurisdiction; or
(b)  another professional license issued by this or another jurisdiction;
(20)  failing to respond to a request by the division in an investigation
authorized under this chapter, including:
(a)  failing to respond to a subpoena;
(b)  withholding evidence; or
(c)  failing to produce documents or records;
(21)  in the case of a dual licensed title licensee as defined in Section
31A-2-402:
(a)  providing a title insurance product or service without the approval
required by Section 31A-2-405; or
(b)  knowingly providing false or misleading information in the statement
required by Subsection 31A-2-405(2); or
(22)  violating an independent contractor agreement between a principal broker
and a sales agent as evidenced by a final judgment of a court.
